Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB569.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 26A.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) When, from any cause, a judge of any Circuit or District Court fails to attend,
or being in attendance cannot properly preside in an action pending in the
court, or if a vacancy occurs or exists in the office of circuit or district judge,
the circuit clerk shall at once certify the facts to the Chief Justice who shall
immediately designate a regular or retired justice or judge of the Court of
Justice as special judge.
(b) 1. If any[either] party files with the circuit clerk his or her affidavit that
the judge will not afford him or her a fair and impartial trial, or will not
impartially decide an application for a change of venue, the circuit clerk
shall at once certify the facts to the Chief Justice who shall immediately
review the facts and determine whether to designate a regular or retired
justice or judge of the Court of Justice as special judge.
2. Any person may submit to the Attorney General his or her affidavit
that the judge will not impartially decide a question of law or a
constitutional challenge to a statute in a pending civil case or appeal.
If the Attorney General determines that the affidavit is made in good
faith and states a prima facie argument that the judge's impartiality
might reasonably be questioned, the Attorney General shall redact any
identifying information from the affidavit regarding the requestor and
submit it to the Chief Justice. If the affidavit contains allegations of a
defamatory nature, the Attorney General may submit the affidavit
under seal. The Chief Justice shall promptly review the facts and
determine whether to designate a regular or retired justice or judge of
the Court of Justice as special judge.
Page 1 of 2
HB056910.100 - 934 - XXXX 3/17/2026 4:00 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 569/GA
(c) Any special judge[ so] selected under this subsection shall have all the
powers and responsibilities of a regular judge of the court.
(2) A retired justice or judge serving as a special judge shall be compensated as
provided by KRS 21A.110.
Section 2. Whereas litigants have a constitutional right to an impartial arbiter
and attorneys should not be deterred from zealously representing the best interests of
their clients by requesting the disqualification of a judge to ensure this right is protected,
and as the citizens of this Commonwealth have an interest in a judiciary whose
impartiality in specific cases should be above reproach, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
HB056910.100 - 934 - XXXX 3/17/2026 4:00 PM GA